Mississippi statutes. Title 13. Evidence, Process and Juries
Chapter 5. Juries

§ 13-5-1.
Who are competent jurors; determination of literacy.

Every citizen not under the age of twenty-one years, who is either a qualified elector, or a resident freeholder of the county for more than one year, is able to read and write, and has not been convicted of an infamous crime, or the unlawful sale of intoxicating liquors within a period of five years and who is not a common gambler or habitual drunkard, is a competent juror. No person who is or has been within twelve months the overseer of a public road or road contractor shall, however, be competent to serve as a grand juror. The lack of any such qualifications on the part of one or more jurors shall not, however, vitiate an indictment or verdict. Moreover, no talesman or tales juror shall be qualified who has served as such talesman or tales juror in the last preceding two years, and no juror shall serve on any jury who has served as such for the last preceding two years. No juror shall serve who has a case of his own pending in that court, provided there are sufficient qualified jurors in the district, and for trial at that term.

In order to determine that prospective jurors can read and write, the presiding judge shall, with the assistance of the clerk, distribute to the jury panel a form to be completed personally by each juror prior to being empaneled as follows:

“1. Your name Last First Middle initial 2. Your home address 3. Your occupation 4. Your age 5. Your telephone number If none, write none 6. If you live outside the county seat, the number of miles you live from the courthouse Miles Sign your name”

Click to view

The judge shall personally examine the answers of each juror prior to empaneling the jury and each juror who cannot complete the above form shall be disqualified as a juror and discharged.

A list of any jurors disqualified for jury duty by reason of inability to complete the form shall be kept by the circuit clerk and their names shall not be placed in the jury box thereafter until such person can qualify as above provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 1 (138); 1857, ch. 61, art. 126; 1871, § 724; 1880, § 1661; 1892, § 2354; 1906, § 2684; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2176; 1930, § 2029; 1942, § 1762; Laws, 1894, ch. 69; Laws, 1914, ch. 208; Laws, 1938, ch. 303; Laws, 1962, ch. 308, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 339, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1970).

§ 13-5-2.
Public policy stated.

It is the policy of this state that all persons selected for jury service be selected at random from a fair cross section of the population of the area served by the court, and that all qualified citizens have the opportunity in accordance with this chapter to be considered for jury service in this state and an obligation to serve as jurors when summoned for that purpose. A citizen shall not be excluded from jury service in this state on account of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or economic status.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch 378, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

§ 13-5-3.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 8 (1); 1857, ch. 61, arts. 128, 135; 1871, §§ 726, 736; 1880, § 1681; 1892, § 2358; 1906, § 2688; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2180; 1930, § 2033; 1942, § 1766; Laws, 1896, ch. 84; Laws, 1938, ch. 298; Law, 1938, Ex. ch. 84; Laws, 1962, ch. 308, § 2; Laws, 1964, ch. 326; Laws, 1968, ch. 338, § 1]

§ 13-5-4.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Court” means the circuit, chancery and county courts of this state and includes, when the context requires, any judge of the court.

“Clerk” and “clerk of the court” means the circuit clerk of the county and any deputy clerk.

“Master list” means the voter registration lists for the county.

“Voter registration lists” means the official records of persons registered to vote in the county.

“Jury wheel” means any physical device or electronic system for the storage of the names or identifying numbers of prospective jurors.

“Jury box” means the jury wheel in which is placed the names or identifying numbers of prospective jurors whose names are drawn at random from the jury wheel and who are not disqualified.

“Senior judge” means the circuit or chancery judge, as the case may be, who has the longest continuous service on the court in a particular judicial district which has more than one (1) such judge, or if the judges are equal in time of service, then the judge who has been engaged for the longest time continuously in the practice of law in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

§ 13-5-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1942, § 1762-01; Laws, 1964, ch. 327, § 1]

§ 13-5-6.
Jury commission—number, appointment, terms, qualifications, and compensation of members.

A jury commission shall be established in each county to manage the jury selection process under the supervision and control of the court. The jury commission shall be composed of three (3) members who will serve a four-year term beginning on January 1, 1975, as follows: One (1) member shall be appointed by the circuit judge of said county; one (1) member shall be appointed by the chancery judge of said county; and one (1) member shall be appointed by the board of supervisors of said county. If there is more than one (1) circuit or chancery judge in a judicial district, then the senior circuit or chancery judge, as the case may be, shall make the said appointment for each county in his district. Any unexpired term shall be filled by the appropriate appointing authority who is in office at the time the vacancy occurs.

A jury commissioner shall have the following qualifications:

He shall be a duly qualified elector at the time of his appointment;

He shall be a resident citizen in the county in which he is to serve; and

He shall not be an attorney nor an elected public official.

Each jury commissioner shall receive compensation at a per diem rate as provided in Section 25-3-69.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 395, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1990.

§ 13-5-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1942, § 1762-02; Laws, 1964, ch. 327, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 336, § 1]

§ 13-5-8.
Master list consisting of county voter registration list to be compiled and maintained; exclusion of persons permanently excused from jury service from list; reinstatement of permanently excused persons.

In April of each year, the jury commission for each county shall compile and maintain a master list consisting of the voter registration list for the county.

The circuit clerk of the county and the registrar of voters shall have the duty to certify to the commission during the month of January of each year under the seal of his office the voter registration list for the county; the list shall exclude any person who has been permanently excused from jury service pursuant to Section 13-5-23(4). Any person who has been excluded from the master list for jury service may be reinstated to the master list after one (1) year by requesting that the circuit clerk reinstate him to the master list.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 456, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 13-5-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1942, § 1762-03; Laws, 1964, ch. 327, § 3; Am Laws, 1972, ch. 372, § 2]

§ 13-5-10.
Jury wheel; selection and deposit of names or identifying numbers of prospective jurors; number required; refilling.

The jury commission for each county shall maintain a jury wheel into which the commission shall place the names or identifying numbers of prospective jurors taken from the master list. If the total number of prospective jurors on the master list is one thousand (1,000) or less, the names or identifying numbers of all of them shall be placed in the jury wheel. In all other cases, the number of prospective jurors to be placed in the jury wheel shall be one thousand (1,000) plus not less than one percent (1%) of the total number of names on the master list. From time to time a larger or additional number may be determined by the jury commission or ordered by the court to be placed in the jury wheel. In April of each year, beginning in 1976, the wheel shall be emptied and refilled as prescribed in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 5(1), eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

§ 13-5-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1942, § 1762-04; Laws, 1964, ch. 327, § 4]

§ 13-5-12.
Jury wheel—selection and deposit of names or identifying numbers of prospective jurors—procedure where less than all names on master list used.

Unless all the names on the master list are to be placed in the jury wheel pursuant to Section 13-5-10, the names or identifying numbers of prospective jurors to be placed in the jury wheel shall be selected by the jury commission at random from the master list in the following manner: The total number of names on the master list shall be divided by the number of names to be placed in the jury wheel; the whole number nearest the quotient shall be the “key number,” except that the key number shall never be less than two (2). A “starting number” for making the selection shall then be determined by a random method from the number from one (1) to the key number, both inclusive. The required number of names shall then be selected from the master list by taking in order the first name on the master list corresponding to the starting number and then successively the names appearing in the master list at intervals equal to the key number, recommencing if necessary at the start of the list until the required number of names has been selected. The name of any person who is under the age of twenty-one (21) years and the name of any person who has been permanently excused from jury service pursuant to Section 13-5-23(4) shall be passed over without interrupting the sequence of selection. Any person who has been excluded from the master list for jury service may be reinstated to the master list after one (1) year by requesting that the circuit clerk reinstate him to the master list. Upon recommencing at the start of the list, names previously selected from the master list shall be disregarded in selecting the additional names. The jury commission may use an electronic or mechanical system or device in carrying out its duties.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 5(2); Laws, 2010, ch. 456, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 13-5-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1880, § 1682; 1892, § 2359; 1906, § 2689; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2181; 1930, § 2034; 1942, § 1767]

§ 13-5-14.
List of names placed in jury wheel to be delivered to senior circuit judge—minute entry.

At any time the jury commission places names in the jury wheel, the jury commission shall also deliver to the senior circuit judge a list of all names placed on or in the jury wheel, and said circuit judge shall spread upon the minutes of the circuit court all of the names so placed in the jury wheel.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 5(3), eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

§ 13-5-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 8 (1); 1857, ch. 61, art. 135; 1871, § 736; 1880, § 1684; 1892, § 2360; 1906, § 2690; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2182; 1930, § 2035; 1942, § 1768]

§ 13-5-16.
Random drawing of names or identifying numbers of prospective jurors; alphabetical list; prohibition against disclosure of names drawn; use of computer or electronic device for random selection.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (2) of this section, from time to time and in a manner prescribed by the court, a private citizen who does not have an interest in a case pending trial and who is not a practicing attorney publicly shall draw at random from the jury wheel the names or identifying numbers of as many prospective jurors as the court by order requires. The clerk shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names drawn. Neither the names drawn nor the list shall be disclosed to any person other than pursuant to this chapter or specific order of the court.

The court may order that the drawing of names or identifying numbers pursuant to subsection (1) of this section may be performed by random selection of a computer or electronic device pursuant to such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 5(4); Laws, 1986, ch. 312, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 13-5-17.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 139; 1871, § 740; 1880, § 1688; 1892, § 2362; 1906, § 2691; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2183; 1930, § 2036; 1942, § 1769]

§ 13-5-18.
Telephone answering device required; cost of device.

The clerk of the circuit court in each county shall purchase and install a telephone answering device for the purpose of providing a recorded message after 5:00 p.m. to jurors who have been summoned to jury duty, in order for such jurors to inquire as to whether their presence will be required in court the following day. The cost of purchasing and maintaining said telephone answering device shall be paid by the board of supervisors from the county general fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 395, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 1990.

§ 13-5-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1880, § 1690; 1892, § 2364; 1906, § 2693; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2185; 1930, § 2038; 1942, § 1771]

§ 13-5-21.
Jury list in counties with two circuit court districts.

In counties where there are two (2) circuit court districts, the jury commission shall make a list of jurors for each district in the manner directed for a county, and the same shall be treated in all respects as for an entire county. In such counties a juror shall not be required to serve out of his district, except should the court, in its discretion, otherwise direct, and except when drawn on a special venire. In either of such excepted cases, the jury shall be drawn from the two (2) jury boxes if the court so direct, one (1) name for each alternately.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 755; 1880, § 1689; 1892, § 2363; 1906, § 2692; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2184; 1930, § 2037; 1942, § 1770; Laws, 1904, ch. 151; Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 8, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

§ 13-5-23.
Exemptions; length of service of tales and grand jurors.

All qualified persons shall be liable to serve as jurors, unless excused by the court for one (1) of the following causes:

When the juror is ill and, on account of the illness, is incapable of performing jury service;

When the juror’s attendance would cause undue or extreme physical or financial hardship to the prospective juror or a person under his or her care or supervision; or

When the potential juror is a breast-feeding mother.

An excuse of illness under subsection (1)(a) of this section may be made to the clerk of court outside of open court by providing the clerk with a certificate of a licensed physician, stating that the juror is ill and is unfit for jury service, in which case the clerk may excuse the juror. If the excuse of illness is not supported by a physician’s certificate, a judge of the court for which the individual was called to jury service shall decide whether to excuse an individual under subsection (1)(a) of this section.

The test of an excuse under subsection (1)(b) of this section for undue or extreme physical or financial hardship shall be whether the individual would either:

Be required to abandon a person under his or her personal care or supervision due to the impossibility of obtaining an appropriate substitute caregiver during the period of participation in the jury pool or on the jury; or

Incur costs that would have a substantial adverse impact on the payment of the individual’s necessary daily living expenses or on those for whom he or she provides the principal means of support; or

Suffer physical hardship that would result in illness or disease.

“Undue or extreme physical or financial hardship” does not exist solely based on the fact that a prospective juror will be required to be absent from his or her place of employment or business.

A judge of the court for which the individual was called to jury service shall decide whether to excuse an individual under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

A person asking to be excused based on a finding of undue or extreme physical or financial hardship must take all actions necessary to have obtained a ruling on that request by no later than the date on which the individual is scheduled to appear for jury duty.

A person asking a judge to grant an excuse under subsection (1)(b) of this section may be required to provide the judge with documentation such as, but not limited to, federal and state income tax returns, medical statements from licensed physicians, proof of dependency or guardianship and similar documents, which the judge finds to clearly support the request to be excused.Failure to provide satisfactory documentation may result in a denial of the request to be excused.

In cases under subsection (1)(c) of this section, the excuse must be made by the juror in open court under oath.

A person is excused from jury service permanently only when the deciding judge determines that the underlying grounds for being excused are of a permanent nature. A person who has been summoned for jury duty who meets the age threshold for exemption from jury service shall have the option to be permanently excused from jury service due to age by filing with the circuit clerk a notarized request to be permanently excused.

Grand jurors shall serve until discharged by the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 10 (4); 1857, ch. 61, art. 127; 1871, § 735; 1880, § 1662; 1892, § 2356; 1906, § 2686; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2178; 1930, § 2031; 1942, § 1764; Laws, 1938, ch. 302; Laws, 1944, ch. 197; Laws, 1976, ch. 464, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 438; Laws, 1990, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 2004, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 520, § 10; Laws, 2007, ch. 433, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2008.

§ 13-5-25.
Who is exempt as a personal privilege.

Every citizen over sixty-five (65) years of age, and everyone who has served as a grand juror or as a petit juror in the trial of a litigated case within two (2) years, shall be exempt from service if the juror claims the privilege.No qualified juror shall be excluded because of any such reasons, but the same shall be a personal privilege to be claimed by any person selected for jury duty.Any citizen over sixty-five (65) years of age may claim this personal privilege outside of open court by providing the clerk of court with information that allows the clerk to determine the validity of the claim.

Provided, however, that no person who has served as a grand juror or as a petit juror in a trial of a litigated case in one (1) court may claim the exemption in any other court where the juror may be called to serve.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, §§ 1661, 1683; 1892, § 2357; 1906, § 2687; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2179; 1930, § 2032; 1942, § 1765; Laws, 1958, ch. 287; Laws, 1960, ch. 236; Laws, 1966, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 464, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 360, § 2, eff from and and after July 1, 1990; Laws, 2004, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 9; Laws, 2006, ch. 437, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 433, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2008.

§ 13-5-26.
Jury box; deposit of names drawn from jury wheel; drawing and assignment of jurors; use of computer or electronic device for random selection.

The circuit clerk shall maintain a jury box and shall place therein the names or identifying numbers of all prospective jurors drawn from the jury wheel.

A judge or any court or any other state or county official having authority to conduct a trial or hearing with a jury within the county may direct the circuit clerk to draw and assign to that court or official the number of jurors he deems necessary for one or more jury panels or as required by law for a grand jury, except as otherwise provided by subsection (3) of this section. Upon receipt of the direction, and in a manner prescribed by the court, the circuit clerk shall publicly draw at random from the jury box the number or jurors specified.

The court may order that the drawing and assigning of jurors pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may be performed by random selection of a computer or electronic device pursuant to such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the court. The jurors drawn for jury service shall be assigned at random by the clerk to each jury panel in a manner prescribed by the court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 6(1, 2); Laws, 1986, ch. 312, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 13-5-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 11, effective from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1892, § 2365; 1906, § 2694; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2186; 1930, § 2039; 1942, § 1772; Laws, 1938, ch. 298; 1938, Ex. ch. 84; 1960, ch. 237; Am Laws, 1972, ch. 372, § 1]

§ 13-5-28.
Summoning of person drawn for jury duty.

If a grand, petit or other jury is ordered to be drawn, the clerk thereafter shall cause each person drawn for jury service to be served with a summons, either personally or by mail, addressed to the juror at the juror’s usual residence, business or post office address, requiring the juror to report for jury service at a specified time and place.The summons shall include instructions to the potential jurors that explain, in layman’s terms, the provisions of Section 13-5-23.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 6(3); Laws, 2004, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 10; Laws, 2006, ch. 437, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 433, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2008.

§ 13-5-29.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1892, § 2366; 1906, § 2695; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2187; 1930, § 2040; 1942, § 1773]

§ 13-5-30.
Summoning of jurors where there is shortage of petit jurors drawn from jury box.

If there is an unanticipated shortage of available petit jurors drawn from a jury box, the court may require the sheriff to summon a sufficient number of petit jurors selected at random by the clerk from the jury box in a manner prescribed by the court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 6(4), eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

§ 13-5-31.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 8 (3); 1857, ch. 61, art. 138; 1871, § 739; 1880, § 1687; 1892, § 2367; 1906, § 2696; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2188; 1930, § 2041; 1942, § 1774]

§ 13-5-32.
Names of jurors drawn from jury box to be made public; exception.

The names of jurors drawn from the jury box shall be made available to the public unless the court determines in any instance that this information in the interest of justice should be kept confidential or its use limited in whole or in part.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 6(5), eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

§ 13-5-33.
Juror may postpone jury service one time only; conditions for postponement; extreme emergency exception.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, individuals scheduled to appear for jury service have the right to postpone the date of their initial appearance for jury service one (1) time only. Postponements shall be granted upon request, provided that:

The juror has not been granted a postponement within the past two (2) years;

The prospective juror appears in person or contacts the clerk of the court by telephone, electronic mail or in writing to request a postponement; and

Prior to the grant of a postponement with the concurrence of the clerk of the court, the prospective juror fixes a date certain to appear for jury service that is not more than six (6) months or two (2) terms of court after the date on which the prospective juror originally was called to serve and on which date the court will be in session, whichever is the longer period.

A subsequent request to postpone jury service may be approved by a judicial officer only in the event of an extreme emergency, such as a death in the family, sudden illness, or a natural disaster or a national emergency in which the prospective juror is personally involved, that could not have been anticipated at the time the initial postponement was granted. Prior to the grant of a second postponement, the prospective juror must fix a date certain on which the individual will appear for jury service within six (6) months or two (2) terms of court after the postponement on a date when the court will be in session.

The Administrative Office of Courts shall promulgate rules for the implementation of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 14; Laws, 2006, ch. 437, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2006).

§ 13-5-34.
Punishment for failure to appear or to complete jury service.

A person summoned for jury service who fails to appear or to complete jury service as directed, and who has failed to obtain a postponement in compliance with the provisions for requesting a postponement, or who fails to appear on the date set pursuant to Section 13-5-33, may be ordered by the court to appear and show cause for failure to comply with the summons.If the juror fails to show good cause for noncompliance with the summons, the juror may be held in civil contempt of court and may be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned not more than three (3) days, or both.The prospective juror may be excused from paying sanctions for good cause shown or in the interest of justice.

In addition to, or in lieu of, the fine or imprisonment provided in subsection (1) of this section, the court may order that the prospective juror complete a period of community service for a period no less than if the prospective juror would have completed jury service, and provide proof of completion of this community service to the court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 6(6); Laws, 2004, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 11; Laws, 2006, ch. 437, § 5; Laws, 2007, ch. 433, § 4, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2008.

§ 13-5-35.
Employment protections for jurors.

It shall be unlawful for any employer or any other person to persuade or attempt to persuade any juror to avoid jury service; to intimidate or to threaten any juror in that respect; or to remove or otherwise subject an employee to adverse employment action as a result of jury service if the employee notifies his or her employer that he or she has been summoned to serve as a juror within a reasonable period of time after receipt of a summons.

It shall be unlawful for an employer to require or request an employee to use annual, vacation or sick leave for time spent responding to a summons for jury duty, time spent participating in the jury selection process, or time spent actually serving on a jury. Nothing in this provision shall be construed to require an employer to provide annual, vacation or sick leave to employees under the provisions of this statute who otherwise are not entitled to such benefits under company policies.

Any violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be deemed an interference with the administration of justice and a contempt of court and punishable as such.

A court shall automatically postpone and reschedule the service of a summoned juror employed by an employer with five (5) or fewer full-time employees, or their equivalent, if another employee of that employer has previously been summoned to appear during the same period. Such postponement will not constitute the excused individual’s right to one (1) automatic postponement under Section 13-5-33.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 15; Laws, 2006, ch. 437, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 20, 2006).

§ 13-5-36.
Preservation of records and papers in connection with selection and service of jurors.

All records and papers compiled and maintained by the jury commission or the clerk in connection with selection and service of jurors shall be preserved by the clerk for four (4) years after the jury wheel used in their selection is emptied and refilled, and for any longer period ordered by the court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 368 § 7, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

§ 13-5-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1974, ch. 378, § 11, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1892, § 2370; 1906, § 2699; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2192; 1930, § 2045; 1942, § 1778]

§ 13-5-38.
Payment of cost of implementation of law.

In counties where the implementation of Sections 13-5-2 through 13-5-16, 13-5-21, 13-5-26 through 13-5-38, and 13-5-41, requires additional clerical or other personnel, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay for such services out of the general county fund of the respective county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 10, eff from and after Jan. 1, 1975.

§ 13-5-39.
Terms of grand juries limited.

Unless otherwise directed by an order of the senior circuit judge, not more than two (2) grand juries shall be drawn or impaneled during a calendar year at or for a term or terms of the circuit court in any county or judicial district of a county; provided, however, upon impanelment, a grand jury may be convened and reconvened in termtime and in vacation. It shall continue to serve from term to term until the next grand jury is impaneled, and it may return indictments to any term of court, notwithstanding that a term of court at which criminal business may be conducted shall intervene between the time the grand jury is impaneled and the time an indictment is returned.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 2189; 1930, § 2042; 1942, § 1775; Laws, 1910, ch. 107; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 351, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 13-5-41.
Number of grand jurors.

The number of grand jurors shall not be less than fifteen (15) nor more than twenty-five (25), in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2371; 1906, § 2700; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2193; 1930, § 2046; 1942, § 1779; Laws, 1896, ch. 84; Laws, 1974, ch. 378, § 9; Laws, 2013, ch. 476, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 13-5-43.
Impaneling as conclusive evidence of competency and qualifications.

Before swearing any grand juror as such, he shall be examined by the court, on oath, touching his qualification. After the grand jurors shall have been sworn and impaneled, no objection shall be raised, by plea or otherwise, to the grand jury, but the impaneling of the grand jury shall be conclusive evidence of its competency and qualifications. However, any party interested may challenge or except to the array for fraud.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 131; 1871, § 729; 1880, § 1667; 1892, § 2375; 1906, § 2704; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2197; 1930, § 2050; 1942, § 1784.

§ 13-5-45.
Foreman to be appointed and all to be sworn.

The court shall appoint one of the grand jurors to be foreman of the grand jury, to whom the following oath shall be administered in open court, in the presence of the rest of the grand jurors, to wit:

“You, as foreman of this grand inquest, shall diligently inquire into, and true presentment make, of all such matters and things as shall be given you in charge, or otherwise come to your knowledge, touching the present service. The counsel of the state, your fellows, and your own you will keep secret. You shall not present any person through malice, hatred or ill will, nor shall you leave any person unpresented through fear, favor or affection, or for any reward, hope or promise thereof, but in all your presentments, you shall present the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, to the best of your skill and understanding. So help you God.”

And the following oath shall be administered to the other jurors, to wit:

“The same oath that your foreman has now taken before you on his part, you, and each of you, shall well and truly observe, and keep on your respective parts. So help you God.”

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 1 (128); 1857, ch. 61, art. 130; 1871, § 731; 1880, § 1666; 1892, § 2372; 1906, § 2701; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2194; 1930, § 2047; 1942, § 1780.

§ 13-5-47.
Judge to charge the grand jury.

The judge shall charge the grand jury concerning its duties and expound the law to it as he shall deem proper, and he shall particularly charge it concerning enforcement of the following statutes:

those against gambling and the unlawful selling and handling of intoxicating liquors;

those relating to gambling with minors, and the giving or selling to them tobacco, narcotics, or liquors;

those providing for the assessment, collection and disbursement of the public revenues, both state and county;

those defining the duties of public officers;

those relating to the collection and paying over of fines and forfeitures;

those relating to providing fire escapes in hotels, theaters and other buildings;

those relating to the management of sixteenth section school trust lands; and

all such other statutes as he shall deem proper at any time.

Moreover, the judge shall especially charge the grand jury with respect to the state forest fire laws as set forth in Section 95-5-25 and Section 92-17-13, and charge that the grand jury shall report to him as to the status of forest protection in the county.

It shall be unlawful for the district attorney or other officer, or person, to deliver to the grand jury the charge required by this section to be delivered by the judge, but this shall not prevent the judge from having the circuit clerk read the charge proposed by the judge, to the grand jury in the presence of the judge, when, by reason of physical infirmity, the judge shall be unable to deliver his charge.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2373; 1906, § 2702; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2195; 1930, § 2048; 1942, §§ 1781, 1782; Laws, 1908, ch. 179; Laws, 1932, ch. 145; Laws, 1970, ch. 340, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 525, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 13-5-49.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1973, ch. 342, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 22, 1973).

[Codes, 1892, § 2374; 1906, § 2703; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2196; 1930, § 2049; 1942, § 1783]

§ 13-5-51.
Places of absent jurors to be filled.

If, after the grand jury has been sworn, any of the members thereof should absent themselves from any cause, or become incompetent to sit, or be excused by the court, the court shall have power to cause others to be sworn in their places.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 61, art. 1 (131); 1857, ch. 61, art. 132; 1871, § 730; 1880, § 1669; 1892, § 2376; 1906, § 2705; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2198; 1930, § 2051; 1942, § 1785.

§ 13-5-53.
Adjournment of grand jury to a day; pay in such case.

The court or judge, in its discretion, may adjourn the grand jury to a subsequent day in termtime or vacation, and the jurors shall receive pay only for the number of days they shall be actually engaged in the performance of their duties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1670; 1892, § 2377; 1906, § 2706; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2199; 1930, § 2052; 1942, § 1786; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 13-5-55.
Grand jury to inspect jail; sheriff punishable.

Each grand jury which is impaneled shall make a personal inspection of the county jail, its condition, sufficiency for the safekeeping of prisoners, and their accommodation and health, and make reports thereof to the court. For any violation or neglect of duty as to the jail, the sheriff may be punished as for a misdemeanor, or may be fined as for a contempt, such not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 64, art. 251; 1871, § 2844; 1880, § 1673; 1892, § 2378; 1906, § 2707; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2200; 1930, § 2053; 1942, § 1787; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 20.

§ 13-5-57.
Grand jury may examine all county offices.

The grand jury shall have free access at all proper hours to the papers, records, accounts and books of all county officers, for all examinations which, in its discretion, it may see fit to make, and may make report to the court in relation thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 64, art. 251; 1871, § 2845; 1880, § 1674; 1892, § 2379; 1906, § 2708; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2201; 1930, § 2054; 1942, § 1788.

§ 13-5-59.
Grand jury to examine tax collector’s books.

It shall be the duty of each grand jury which is impaneled to examine the tax collector’s books and his reports and settlements, and make report thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1675; 1892, § 2380; 1906, § 2709; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2202; 1930, § 2055; 1942, § 1789; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 21.

§ 13-5-61.
Grand jury not to disclose secrets of jury-room.

A grand juror, except when called as a witness in court, shall not disclose any proceeding or action had by the grand jury in relation to offenses brought before it, within six (6) months after final adjournment of the grand jury upon which he served, nor shall any grand juror disclose the name or testimony of any witness who has been before the grand jury on pain of fine or imprisonment for contempt of court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 64, art. 252; 1871, § 2846; 1880, § 1676; 1892, § 2381; 1906, § 2710; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2203; 1930, § 2056; 1942, § 1790; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 13-5-63.
Witnesses before grand jury may be subpoenaed and sworn.

The foreman of the grand jury shall have power to order subpoenas for all witnesses desired to be produced, and he shall also have power to swear all witnesses. A record shall be kept by the foreman and returned to court, certified and signed by the foreman, of the names of all witnesses sworn before the grand jury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 61, art. 134; 1871, § 735; 1880, § 1677; 1892, § 2382; 1906, § 2711; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2204; 1930, § 2057; 1942, § 1791.

§ 13-5-65.
Impaneling of petit juries.

After the drawing of the grand jury, the remaining jurors in attendance shall be impaneled into three petit juries for the first week of court if there be a sufficient number left, and, if not, the court may direct a sufficient number for that purpose to be drawn and summoned. If there be more than enough jurors for the three juries, or for two juries if the court shall direct only two to be impaneled, the excess may be discharged, or they may be retained, in the discretion of the court, to serve as talesmen. If so retained, they shall have the privilege of members of the regular panel, of exemption from service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2383; 1906, § 2712; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2205; 1930, § 2058; 1942, § 1792; Laws, 1938, ch. 301.